Tennessee, session 114, HB1997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-302(c), is amended by deleting
"large aircraft" wherever it appears in subdivision (c)(1) and substituting instead "aircraft".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-302(c)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(3) As used in this subsection (c):
(A) "Affiliate" means a company owned and controlled by or under the
common ownership and control of, and conducting business at, an authorized
aircraft service facility;
(B) "Aircraft" means a helicopter as defined in § 67-6-313(h)(2) or an
airplane;
(C) "Aircraft accessories" means any accessories, appurtenances,
equipment, software, systems, or components for installation or use in
connection with any aircraft mainframes or aircraft engines;
(D) "Aircraft engine equipment" means any aircraft engine, including all
associated parts, appurtenances, and accessories, for the propulsion of an
aircraft mainframe;
(E) "Aircraft mainframes" means any aircraft body, wing, rotor system, tail
assembly, aileron, rudder, landing gear, engine housing, and any other assembly
or component integral to the aerodynamic structure of an aircraft;
HB1997
010925
- 1 -

(F) "Authorized aircraft service facility" means a repair station located
within this state that is engaged in repair and refurbishment services of aircraft
mainframes, aircraft engine equipment, and aircraft accessories under a valid air
agency certificate issued by the federal aviation administration in accordance
with 14 CFR Part 145 of the federal aviation regulations, with an organization
designation authority, or other similar or successor certificate and authority as the
federal aviation administration may provide for from time to time; and
(G) "Repair and refurbishment services" includes, but is not limited to,
testing, inspections, interior completions, refurbishments, installations, painting,
modifications, repairs, maintenance, or overhaul of aircraft mainframes, aircraft
engine equipment, and aircraft accessories.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-313(h)(1)(D)(ii), is amended by
deleting "with respect to aircraft qualifying as 'transport category aircraft' under 14 CFR, parts
25, 29, 91 and 121".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-313(k), is amended by deleting
"large aircraft" wherever it appears in subdivisions (1) and (2) and substituting instead "aircraft".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-313(k), is amended by deleting
subdivisions (3)(A) and (3)(B) and substituting instead:
(A) "Aircraft and related equipment" means any aircraft consisting of an aircraft
mainframe and aircraft engine equipment, including any aircraft accessories associated
with the aircraft or aircraft engine, whether installed or uninstalled;
(B) "Aircraft", "aircraft accessories", "aircraft engine equipment", "aircraft
mainframes", "authorized aircraft service facility", and "repair and refurbishment
services" have the same meanings as defined in § 67-6-302; and
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010925